Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.905

Existing liabilities not terminated—Continuation of corporate existence—Application of chapter.

The enactment of this chapter shall not have the effect of terminating, or in any way modifying, any liability, civil or criminal, which shall already be in existence at the date this chapter becomes effective; and any corporation existing under any prior law which expires on or before the date when this chapter takes effect shall continue its corporate existence: PROVIDED, That this chapter shall apply prospectively to all existing corporations which do not otherwise qualify under the provisions of Titles 23B and 24 RCW, to the extent permitted by the Constitution of this state and of the United States.

[ 1991 c 72 s 44; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 105.]